Utah statutes.
56-2-7.   Exercise of fencing power by commission -- Necessity of
application by livestock owners.
The Public Service Commission may exercise the jurisdiction and authority
granted in Section 56-2-6 only when at least three persons with the right to
drive, range, or graze sheep, cattle, horses, or mules upon land adjacent to
the portion of the railroad sought to be fenced file a request for agency
action with the Public Service Commission.
